Maryland, session 2026, HB0211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–305.
(J) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY
LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY THAT IS:
(I) OWNED BY THE FRATERNAL ORDER OF POLICE LODGE 34;
AND
(II) LOCATED AT 730 WAMPLER ROAD, MIDDLE RIVER,
MARYLAND.
(2) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF THE PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL EQUAL 100% OF THE PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED ON THE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –